North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-04 Duties, Records, and Meetings
44-04-30.
Records of the state fire marshal, fire departments, and rural fire protection districts confidential.

An investigation record of the state fire marshal, a fire department, or a rural fire protection district is confidential until the investigation:

Is closed and not referred for further criminal investigation or prosecution; or

The criminal investigation is no longer active under section 44-04-18.7.

This subsection does not restrict the release of the name and identifiable biographical information of a child under section 12.1-35-03.

Standard operating procedures written for emergency response, prefire action plans, plans of a building, pipeline, electrical system, or any other infrastructure plan in the possession of the state fire marshal, a fire department, or rural fire protection district are exempt from section 44-04-18.

Individually identifiable health information obtained by the state fire marshal, a fire department, or a rural fire protection district is confidential.

An image of a victim of a fire is an exempt record.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 382, § 11; 2021, ch. 328, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-31.
Business associate — Duty to protect information.

As used in this section, “business associate” has the meaning set forth in title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 160, section 103.

If a public entity is acting as a business associate of another public entity, the entity acting as a business associate shall comply with all the requirements applicable to a business associate under title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 164, section 504, subsection e, paragraph 2.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 211, § 25.

44-04-32.
Animal feeding operation record requests.

The department of environmental quality shall keep a written record of each individual who requests information and the type of information requested regarding an animal feeding operation permit. Within seven business days of receiving the request, the department shall provide written notice to the owner and operator of the animal feeding operation describing the type of information that has been requested and the name and address of the requester. If an individual makes inquiries on more than three files in any one request, the department shall charge the individual a fee sufficient to cover the cost of mailing the notice to the owners and operators whose files are being examined and a fee for copying the records as allowed under section 44-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 379, § 1; 2017, ch. 199, § 55.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

44-04-33.
Reservation of powers not granted to the federal government.

Pursuant to the tenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States, public officials and employees in this state need not carry out or comply with an executive order of the president of the United States, a regulation of a federal agency or department, or a federal statute infringing on powers reserved to the several states.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 330, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.